Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1001
Funding for assistance to problem gamblers; legislative findings and intent.

The Legislature finds that the main sources of funding for assistance to problem gamblers are the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund as provided in section 9-1,101, annual gaming tax proceeds as provided in section 9-1204, and the State Lottery Operation Trust Fund as provided in section 9-812. It is the intent of the Legislature that such funding be used primarily for counseling and treatment services for problem gamblers and their families who are residents of Nebraska.

Laws 2013, LB6, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 33.
July 1, 2026